Ohio, session 136, HB880.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. All items in this act are hereby appropriated as designated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the credit of the designated fund. For all operating appropriations made in this act, those in the first column are for fiscal year 2026 and those in the second column are for fiscal year 2027. The operating appropriations made in this act are in addition to any other operating appropriations made for these fiscal years. Section 2. 1 2 3 4 5 A EDU DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION AND WORKFORCE B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 5AQ1 2006A4 Literacy Improvement $6,938,636 $0 D Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $6,938,636 $0 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $6,938,636 $0 LITERACY IMPROVEMENT The foregoing appropriation item 2006A4, Literacy Improvement, shall be used to fully reimburse school districts, community schools, and STEM schools for stipends paid to teachers to complete professional development in the science of reading and evidence-based strategies for effective literacy instruction under Section 265.330 of H.B. 33 of the 135th General Assembly, as amended by H.B. 147 of the 135th General Assembly. On the effective date of this section, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $1,105,400 cash from the General Revenue Fund to the Literacy Improvement Fund (Fund 5AQ1). Section 3. Within the limits set forth in this act, the Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation made in this act, and shall determine the manner in which appropriation accounts shall be maintained. Expenditures from operating appropriations contained in this act shall be accounted for as though made in, and are subject to all applicable provisions of, H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly.